Maryland, session 2025, HB0319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–106.
EACH COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL PUBLISH PROMINENTLY ON ITS
WEBSITE THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE RESPECTIVE
COUNTY BOARD, AS FOLLOWS:
(1) FOR NONSTUDENT MEMBERS:
(I) AN E–MAIL ADDRESS;
(II) A MAILING ADDRESS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0319*

HOUSE BILL 319
(III) A DIRECT TELEPHONE NUMBER THAT IS PROVIDED BY THE
COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(2) FOR STUDENT MEMBERS, IF APPLICABLE, AN E–MAIL ADDRESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.